Illinois, session 104th, SB42.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-502.1 and 11-502.15 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-502.1)7    Sec. 11-502.1. Possession of medical cannabis in a motor 8vehicle.9    (a) No driver, who is a medical cannabis cardholder, may 10use medical cannabis within the passenger area of any motor 11vehicle upon a highway in this State.12    (b) No driver, who is a medical cannabis cardholder, a 13medical cannabis designated caregiver, medical cannabis 14cultivation center agent, or dispensing organization agent may 15possess medical cannabis within any area of any motor vehicle 16upon a highway in this State except in a secured, sealed or 17resealable, odor-proof, and child-resistant medical cannabis 18container that is inaccessible.19    (c) No passenger, who is a medical cannabis card holder, a 20medical cannabis designated caregiver, or medical cannabis 21dispensing organization agent may possess medical cannabis 22within any passenger area of any motor vehicle upon a highway 23in this State except in a secured, sealed or resealable,   SB0042 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06323 LNS 16358 b1odor-proof, and child-resistant medical cannabis container 2that is inaccessible.3    (d) Any person who violates subsections (a) through (c) of 4this Section:5        (1) commits a Class A misdemeanor;6        (2) shall be subject to revocation of his or her 7    medical cannabis card for a period of 2 years from the end 8    of the sentence imposed; and 9        (3) shall be subject to revocation of his or her 10    status as a medical cannabis caregiver, medical cannabis 11    cultivation center agent, or medical cannabis dispensing 12    organization agent for a period of 2 years from the end of 13    the sentence imposed. 14(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 15102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 16    (625 ILCS 5/11-502.15)17    Sec. 11-502.15. Possession of adult use cannabis in a 18motor vehicle.19    (a) No driver may use cannabis within the passenger area 20of any motor vehicle upon a highway in this State.21    (b) No driver may possess cannabis within any area of any 22motor vehicle upon a highway in this State except in a secured, 23sealed or resealable, odor-proof, child-resistant cannabis 24container that is inaccessible.25    (c) No passenger may possess cannabis within any passenger   SB0042 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06323 LNS 16358 b1area of any motor vehicle upon a highway in this State except 2in a secured, sealed or resealable, odor-proof, 3child-resistant cannabis container that is inaccessible.4    (d) Any person who knowingly violates subsection (a), (b), 5or (c) of this Section commits a Class A misdemeanor.6    (e) If a motor vehicle is driven or occupied by an 7individual 21 years of age or over, a law enforcement officer 8may not stop or detain the motor vehicle or its driver nor 9inspect or search the motor vehicle, the contents of the motor 10vehicle, or the operator or passenger of the motor vehicle 11solely based on the odor of burnt or raw cannabis. 12(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 102-98, eff. 7-15-21.)